Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3812
Nebraska Agricultural Products Marketing Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Nebraska Agricultural Products Marketing Cash Fund. The fund shall consist of money appropriated by the Legislature which is received as gifts or grants or collected as fees or charges from any source, including federal, state, public, and private. The fund shall be utilized for the purpose of carrying out the Nebraska Agricultural Products Marketing Act. Any money in such fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1982, LB 942, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 807, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 21.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.